North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 12. Penalties.

§ 106-405.20.
Civil penalties.

The Commissioner may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule promulgated thereunder. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1995, c. 516, s. 8; 1998-215, s. 12.